Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 4.1 Court Clerks’ Incentive Pay

8-4.1-1.
Incentive pay plan.

There is hereby established an incentive pay program in accordance with the provisions of this chapter offering financial compensation to clerks of the supreme, superior, family, and district courts and administrators of the workers’ compensation court for furthering their education in the field of court administration or law enforcement. This incentive program shall apply to clerks who hold this position on July 5, 1994, and shall not apply to any person hired as a clerk after July 5, 1994.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 125, § 1.

8-4.1-2.
Eligibility for plan.

Any full time clerk of the supreme, superior, family, or district court or administrators of the workers’ compensation court shall be eligible for the plan established by this chapter provided he or she:

Has, on or before July 5, 1994, acquired the requisite degree as set forth in §

8-4.1-3

; or

Has, on or before July 5, 1994, accumulated at least fifty percent (50%) of the credits necessary to receive either degree as set forth in §

8-4.1-3

and thereafter receives that degree; or

Is, on July 5, 1994, enrolled in a degree program, completion of which will entitle him or her to either degree as set forth in § 8-4.1-3, and thereafter receives that degree.

The clerk, within thirty (30) days after July 5, 1994, must submit to the court administrator a certified copy of a transcript from a college or university as evidence of such credits. Provided, however, notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, incentive payments shall not be continued to any person in the future when the person no longer holds a clerk position as set forth in this section. Additionally, no clerk hired after July 5, 1994, shall be eligible to receive incentive payments under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 125, 1.

8-4.1-3.
Incentive steps.

Advancement to each of the incentive salary steps shall be based on the following accomplishments in either administration of justice or law enforcement, or a baccalaureate degree acceptable for admission to a law school accredited by the council of Legal Education of the American Bar Association.

Incentive Increase Above Degree Steps Basic Salary Required 1 $2,000 Associate Degree 2 $3,200 Baccalaureate Degree

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 125, § 1.

8-4.1-4.
Eligible education.

No credit shall be granted for any degree other than in the major concentration of court administration or law enforcement or a baccalaureate degree acceptable for admission to a law school accredited by the council of Legal Education of the American Bar Association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 549, § 1.

8-4.1-5.
Appropriation.

The state of Rhode Island shall bear the expense of incentive payments. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and the controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or so much thereof as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 205, § 1.

8-4.1-6.
Additional credit for masters degree.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, every full time clerk of the supreme, superior, family, or district court who earns the degree of master in public administration shall be paid, in addition to basic salary and any other credit to which he or she is entitled hereunder, the additional sum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 409, § 1.

8-4.1-7.
Effective date.

Sections

8-4.1-1

—

8-4.1-3

shall not take effect for any existing court clerks or administrators presently receiving an incentive pay under this chapter until the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement in existence on July 5, 1994. However, upon the expiration of the collective bargaining agreement which is in effect at the time of July 5, 1994, §§

8-4.1-1

—

8-4.1-3

shall apply to all existing clerks receiving an incentive under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 125, § 2.